Connecticut, session 2026, SB00319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2027) The Department of Energy
2 and Environmental Protection shall reactivate the 2010 Lawn
3 Equipment Exchange Fund for municipalities and regional school
4 districts.
5 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 31,
6 2028, the Connecticut Green Bank shall create a loan program or loan
7 products that are tailored to assist Connecticut registered commercial
8 landscapers with the purchase or lease of battery-operated lawn
9 equipment. The Connecticut Green Bank shall use existing statutory
10 authority and access to capital, as well as lending partnerships to create
11 such loans or loan products.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 319
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1, "regional schools" was changed to "regional school
districts", for accuracy.
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2